Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5501.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 12-13-1 of the General Laws in Chapter 12-13 entitled "Bail and
Recognizance" is hereby amended to read as follows:
12-13-1. Right to release pending trial on giving of recognizance.
(a) Felony cases. Every person who is held on any criminal process to answer to any
indictment, information, or complaint against him or her shall be released upon giving recognizance
with sufficient surety or sureties before a justice of the supreme or superior court or before a justice
of the district court, when the complaint is pending in that court or the person is held to answer to
that court, in the sum named in the process, if any has been named in it, and if none is named, then
in any sum that the justice shall deem reasonable, to appear before the court where the indictment,
information, or complaint is pending against him or her, or to which he or she may be bound over
to appear, to answer to the indictment, information, or complaint, and to answer to it whenever
called upon so to do, and abide the final order of the court, and in the meantime keep the peace and
be of good behavior. Any justice may take the recognizance in any place within the state, and the
recognizance shall be returned to the court to which the accused has recognized to appear.
(b) Misdemeanor cases.
(1) Every person who is subject to any misdemeanor criminal process shall be released
without bail but on their own recognizance and an order to abide by any conditions set by the court.
(2) Release on non-monetary conditions shall be applied to assure the presence of the
accused in court as required and to protect the safety of the community.

(c) In every case, the setting of bail and conditions shall be subject to § 12-13-1.3(e).
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001067
========
LC001067 - Page 2 of 3